Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3702
Definitions, sections found.

For the purposes of sections 44-3701 to 44-3721, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 44-3703 to 44-3708 shall apply.

Laws 1981, LB 113, § 2.